Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.04
Child support; withholding of earnings; service of documents.

Service of the documents required by the provisions of section 42-364.03 shall be made in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action, except that certified mail service may not be used.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 49;

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 28.